Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-302
Lien; scope.

Any person who transports or hauls oil field equipment under express contract with the owner or operator of any gas or oil leasehold interest in real property, the owner or operator of any gas pipeline or oil pipeline, the owner of any oil field equipment and material, or the trustee, agent, or receiver of any such owner, shall have a lien upon the interest of such owner in the oil field equipment so transported and hauled. The lien shall include, in addition to the charge for hauling or transporting, labor performed, or materials used and expended in the transporting, erecting, dismantling, loading, and unloading of any oil field machinery, equipment, or supplies hauled or transported.

Laws 1951, c. 185, § 2, p. 690.